Georgia, session 2025_26, HB913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general authority, duties, and procedure of the Department of Administrative
Services relative to state purchasing, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
H. B. 913
- 1 -

LC 59 0172
"50-5-86.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'governmental entity' means any department,
agency, board, bureau, commission, authority, county, municipal corporation, school
system, or other political subdivision of this state.
(b) A contract procured by a governmental entity for the licensing of software applications
designed to run on generally available desktop or server hardware shall not limit such
governmental entity's ability to install or run such software applications on the desktop or
server hardware of such governmental entity's choosing."
SECTION 2.
(a) This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming
law without such approval.
(b) This Act shall apply to all contracts for the licensing of software applications entered into
by governmental entities on or after the effective date of this Act, and to any renewals,
modifications, or extensions of such agreements entered into on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 913
- 2 -